Missouri, session 2026, SB1044.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 135.390, to read as
follows:
135.390. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the department of economic
development;
(2) "Eligible taxpayer", a taxpayer who is a:
(a) Qualified provider of employment services to
homeless persons;
(b) Qualified provider of employment to homeless
persons; or
(c) Qualified provider of housing to homeless persons;
(3) "Homeless", the same meaning as assigned to that
term under section 67.1062;
(4) "Qualified provider of employment services to
homeless persons", a taxpayer who has been certified
pursuant to subsection 4 of this section;

SB 1044 2
(5) "Qualified provider of employment to homeless
persons", a taxpayer who has been certified pursuant to
subsection 5 of this section;
(6) "Qualified provider of housing to homeless
persons", a taxpayer who has been certified pursuant to
subsection 6 of this section;
(7) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise
due pursuant to chapter 143, excluding withholding tax
imposed pursuant to sections 143.191 to 143.265;
(8) "Taxpayer", a person, firm, a partner in a firm,
corporation, or a shareholder in an S corporation doing
business in the state of Missouri and subject to the state
income tax imposed by the provisions of chapter 143,
including any charitable organization which is exempt from
federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated business
taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income
tax imposed under chapter 143.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2027, an eligible taxpayer shall be allowed to claim a tax
credit against such taxpayer's income tax liability in an
amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each tax year
in which the eligible taxpayer is a qualified provider of
employment services, a qualified provider of employment, or
a qualified provider of housing services to homeless
persons. Tax credits authorized by this section shall not
be refundable or transferable, but may be carried forward to
a taxpayer's subsequent three tax years.
3. The total amount of tax credits authorized under
this section shall not exceed one million dollars per fiscal
year.
4. The department shall be responsible for creating
and publishing guidelines for determining who is a qualified

SB 1044 3
provider of employment services to homeless persons. The
department shall create an application for taxpayers to
apply to be certified as qualified providers of employment
services to homeless persons. In order to receive such
certification, a taxpayer shall, at a minimum, demonstrate
that such taxpayer provides services or training designed
specifically to help homeless persons find and secure
meaningful employment opportunities. Examples of taxpayers
who may receive such a certification include, but are not
limited to, workforce development agencies and employment
training agencies who provide educational and job-seeking
services tailored specifically for homeless persons. Any
certification granted under this subsection shall be valid
for twelve months, and such certification may be
reauthorized for subsequent years.
5. The department shall be responsible for creating
and publishing guidelines for determining who is a qualified
provider of employment to homeless persons. The department
shall create an application for taxpayers to apply to be
certified as qualified providers of employment to homeless
persons. In order to receive such certification, a taxpayer
shall, at a minimum, demonstrate that such taxpayer provides
employment of at least twenty-eight hours per week, at a
wage rate that meets or exceeds the state minimum wage rate
under section 290.502, to one or more homeless persons. Any
certification granted under this subsection shall be valid
for twelve months, and such certification may be
reauthorized for subsequent years.
6. The department shall be responsible for creating
and publishing guidelines for determining who is a qualified
provider of housing for homeless persons. The department
shall create an application for taxpayers to apply to be

SB 1044 4
certified as qualified providers of housing to homeless
persons. In order to receive such certification, a taxpayer
shall, at a minimum, demonstrate that such taxpayer leases,
rents, or provides free of charge adequate income-based
residential housing to homeless persons. Any certification
granted under this subsection shall be valid for twelve
months, and such certification may be reauthorized for
subsequent years.
7. The department shall design and publish an
application for taxpayers to receive the credit authorized
in this section. The application shall require a taxpayer
to provide proof that such taxpayer has been certified or
recertified, within one calendar year of the date such
application is received by the department, as a qualified
provider of employment services, employment, or housing to
homeless persons, under subsections 4 to 6 of this section.
Applications shall be accepted and approved by the
department on a first-come, first-served basis. Subject to
the provisions of subsection 3 of this section, the
department shall issue certificates of eligibility to those
100 taxpayers who submit applications which have been approved.
101 8. The tax credit authorized pursuant to this section
102 shall be considered a domestic and social tax credit for the
103 purposes of sections 135.800 to 135.830.
104 9. The department may promulgate such rules or
105 regulations as are necessary to administer the provisions of
106 this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term
107 is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
108 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
109 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
110 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
111 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and

SB 1044 5
112 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
113 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
114 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
115 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
116 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
117 2026, shall be invalid and void.
118 10. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri Sunset
119 Act:
120 (1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
121 shall automatically sunset December 31, 2032, unless
122 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
123 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
124 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
125 which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
126 sunset; and
127 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
128 construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
129 obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
130 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
131 prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
132 section is sunset.
✓